Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5903.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-19-34.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-19 entitled "Evidence"
is hereby repealed.
9-19-34.1. Collateral source rule in medical malpractice actions.
In the event the defendant so elects, in a legal action based upon a cause of action arising
after January 1, 1987, for personal injury against a licensed physician, hospital, clinic, health
maintenance organization, professional service corporation providing health care services under
chapter 5.1 of title 7, dentist, or dental hygienist based upon professional negligence, the defendant
may introduce evidence of any amount payable as a benefit to the plaintiff as a result of the personal
injury pursuant to any state income disability or workers’ compensation act, any health, sickness
or income disability insurance, accident insurance that provides health benefits or income disability
coverage, and any contract or agreement of any group, organization, partnership, or corporation to
provide, pay for, or reimburse the cost of medical, hospital, dental, or other health care services.
Where the defendant elects to introduce such evidence, the plaintiff may introduce evidence of any
amount which the plaintiff has paid or contributed to secure his or her right to any insurance benefits
concerning which the defendant has introduced evidence. When such evidence is introduced, the
jury shall be instructed to reduce the award for damages by a sum equal to the difference between
the total benefits received and the total amount paid to secure the benefits by the plaintiff or the
court may ascertain the sum by special interrogatory and reduce the award for damages after

verdict. Whenever an award is so reduced, the lien of any first party payor who has paid such a
benefit against the judgment shall be foreclosed and the plaintiff shall have no legal obligation to
reimburse the payor.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002299
========
LC002299 - Page 2 of 3